ug.aff
LANG ug_AR
SET UTF-8
TRY ئاەېىوۇۆۈبپتجچخدرزژۋسشغفقكگڭلمنھي
FLAG num

SFX 0 N 1
SFX 0 0 لەنگەنىدى .

SFX 1 N 1
SFX 1 0 دلىشىش .

SFX 2 N 1
SFX 2 0 ېلىق .

SFX 3 N 1
SFX 3 0 دىكىلا .

SFX 4 N 1
SFX 4 0 ىشلەر .

SFX 5 N 1
SFX 5 0 ەلىسىڭىز .

SFX 6 N 1
SFX 6 0 چاقلىق .

SFX 7 N 1
SFX 7 0 ھەت .

SFX 8 N 1
SFX 8 0 يونى .

SFX 9 N 1
SFX 9 0 تمەستىن .

SFX 10 N 1
SFX 10 0 ۇللىرىنى .

SFX 11 N 1
SFX 11 0 ۋالماقچى .

SFX 12 N 1
SFX 12 0 گەردان .

SFX 13 N 1
SFX 13 0 تۇڭمۇ .

SFX 14 N 1
SFX 14 0 تمىغانلار .

SFX 15 N 1
SFX 15 0 تىڭىزغا .

SFX 16 N 1
SFX 16 0 ىلسا .

SFX 17 N 1
SFX 17 0 لەيدىغانلىقىغا .

SFX 18 N 1
SFX 18 0 كىسىنىڭ .

SFX 19 N 1
SFX 19 0 چىلاردىكى .

SFX 20 N 1
SFX 20 0 ۈرەتتى .

SFX 21 N 1
SFX 21 0 ونىدا .

SFX 22 N 1
SFX 22 0 مىزدىلا .

SFX 23 N 1
SFX 23 0 انغۇچى .

SFX 24 N 1
SFX 24 0 رلۇق .

SFX 25 N 1
SFX 25 0 پسىلەر .

SFX 26 N 1
SFX 26 0 انلىقلار .

SFX 27 N 1
SFX 27 0 يەلمەي .

SFX 28 N 1
SFX 28 0 ەلىرى .

SFX 29 N 1
SFX 29 0 ىلىقلىرىغا .

SFX 30 N 1
SFX 30 0 ەيدىغان .

SFX 31 N 1
SFX 31 0 مۇسىز .

SFX 32 N 1
SFX 32 0 ناچە .

SFX 33 N 1
SFX 33 0 ىيلىكتىن .

SFX 34 N 1
SFX 34 0 مىغانىدى .

SFX 35 N 1
SFX 35 0 ودقا .

SFX 36 N 1
SFX 36 0 ىقىمىزدىن .

SFX 37 N 1
SFX 37 0 ەكلەشمەك .

SFX 38 N 1
SFX 38 0 بويى .

SFX 39 N 1
SFX 39 0 ىكىڭىزنى .

SFX 40 N 1
SFX 40 0 يالايسىز .

SFX 41 N 1
SFX 41 0 ەسلىكىدە .

SFX 42 N 1
SFX 42 0 مىزدىمۇ .

SFX 43 N 1
SFX 43 0 ىلىكلىك .

SFX 44 N 1
SFX 44 0 شكىلا .

SFX 45 N 1
SFX 45 0 رمايدۇ .

SFX 46 N 1
SFX 46 0 لۈكى .

SFX 47 N 1
SFX 47 0 يوپۇرماق .

SFX 48 N 1
SFX 48 0 ۇرغىنىڭىزغا .

SFX 49 N 1
SFX 49 0 ھلىرىنى .

SFX 50 N 1
SFX 50 0 وزىنىڭ .

SFX 51 N 1
SFX 51 0 ىمۇ .

SFX 52 N 1
SFX 52 0 ىيدا .

SFX 53 N 1
SFX 53 0 جىمۇ .

SFX 54 N 1
SFX 54 0 ۇندا .

SFX 55 N 1
SFX 55 0 رۈش .

SFX 56 N 1
SFX 56 0 اڭلارنى .

SFX 57 N 1
SFX 57 0 وسكوپ .

SFX 58 N 1
SFX 58 0 ۇۋەتكەن .

SFX 59 N 1
SFX 59 0 شىۋاتىدۇ .

SFX 60 N 1
SFX 60 0 سلىرىغا .

SFX 61 N 1
SFX 61 0 غىدۇر .

SFX 62 N 1
SFX 62 0 دىشىش .

SFX 63 N 1
SFX 63 0 ماسلىققا .

SFX 64 N 1
SFX 64 0 تىنىلا .

SFX 65 N 1
SFX 65 0 رچىلىك .

SFX 66 N 1
SFX 66 0 ەتنىلا .

SFX 67 N 1
SFX 67 0 اركىن .

SFX 68 N 1
SFX 68 0 شات .

SFX 69 N 1
SFX 69 0 تكىسى .

SFX 70 N 1
SFX 70 0 اشلىرىمىز .

SFX 71 N 1
SFX 71 0 نىشتا .

SFX 72 N 1
SFX 72 0 ىلگەنىدى .

SFX 73 N 1
SFX 73 0 نگەچ .

SFX 74 N 1
SFX 74 0 اشات .

SFX 75 N 1
SFX 75 0 اڭچۇ .

SFX 76 N 1
SFX 76 0 ەشجان .

SFX 77 N 1
SFX 77 0 ىشقان .

SFX 78 N 1
SFX 78 0 ارلىقىنىڭ .

SFX 79 N 1
SFX 79 0 زگىمۇ .

SFX 80 N 1
SFX 80 0 ندىلىرى .

SFX 81 N 1
SFX 81 0 ۇتتەك .

SFX 82 N 1
SFX 82 0 پلىشىش .

SFX 83 N 1
SFX 83 0 مىلىتىش .

SFX 84 N 1
SFX 84 0 انىغۇچ .

SFX 85 N 1
SFX 85 0 زمدىن .

SFX 86 N 1
SFX 86 0 رگۈچى .

SFX 87 N 1
SFX 87 0 ۇنچى .

SFX 88 N 1
SFX 88 0 ۇللار .

SFX 89 N 1
SFX 89 0 ىچىلىكنىڭ .

SFX 90 N 1
SFX 90 0 ىڭما .

SFX 91 N 1
SFX 91 0 ۈرەر .

SFX 92 N 1
SFX 92 0 انگۈل .

SFX 93 N 1
SFX 93 0 منى .

SFX 94 N 1
SFX 94 0 ەكمەن .

SFX 95 N 1
SFX 95 0 مىشلىرى .

SFX 96 N 1
SFX 96 0 تۇرۇشنى .

SFX 97 N 1
SFX 97 0 تارمۇ .

SFX 98 N 1
SFX 98 0 شقاچ .

SFX 99 N 1
SFX 99 0 ەمدىم .

SFX 100 N 1
SFX 100 0 ھۆر .

SFX 101 N 1
SFX 101 0 ەنمىش .

SFX 102 N 1
SFX 102 0 قماپتۇ .

SFX 103 N 1
SFX 103 0 ازمۇ .

SFX 104 N 1
SFX 104 0 باغدىكى .

SFX 105 N 1
SFX 105 0 مىن .

SFX 106 N 1
SFX 106 0 رۇسقا .

SFX 107 N 1
SFX 107 0 ىپسەن .

SFX 108 N 1
SFX 108 0 لاشما .

SFX 109 N 1
SFX 109 0 اراللىق .

SFX 110 N 1
SFX 110 0 ەنمىگەن .

SFX 111 N 1
SFX 111 0 مەسلىكتەك .

SFX 112 N 1
SFX 112 0 ىڭلاردا .

SFX 113 N 1
SFX 113 0 مىسەم .

SFX 114 N 1
SFX 114 0 لىتىلىش .

SFX 115 N 1
SFX 115 0 مپا .

SFX 116 N 1
SFX 116 0 ررىدە .

SFX 117 N 1
SFX 117 0 وسلۇق .

SFX 118 N 1
SFX 118 0 دارلىقنى .

SFX 119 N 1
SFX 119 0 چىقىش .

SFX 120 N 1
SFX 120 0 لىرىغا .

SFX 121 N 1
SFX 121 0 مىغاچ .

SFX 122 N 1
SFX 122 0 ۋالغۇچى .

SFX 123 N 1
SFX 123 0 گەرلىك .

SFX 124 N 1
SFX 124 0 تىلسە .

SFX 125 N 1
SFX 125 0 دۇرۇشتىن .

SFX 126 N 1
SFX 126 0 ىۋالغىلى .

SFX 127 N 1
SFX 127 0 اردەكلا .

SFX 128 N 1
SFX 128 0 ياغاچ .

SFX 129 N 1
SFX 129 0 ۇلىن .

SFX 130 N 1
SFX 130 0 تقانلارنى .

SFX 131 N 1
SFX 131 0 ىنىمىزچە .

SFX 132 N 1
SFX 132 0 ۋىيە .

SFX 133 N 1
SFX 133 0 كارى .

SFX 134 N 1
SFX 134 0 ىساقمۇ .

SFX 135 N 1
SFX 135 0 ىلىككەن .

SFX 136 N 1
SFX 136 0 راقتەك .

SFX 137 N 1
SFX 137 0 غىزا .

SFX 138 N 1
SFX 138 0 ايدىغىنى .

SFX 139 N 1
SFX 139 0 وگارىفما .

SFX 140 N 1
SFX 140 0 اتقىنىمىز .

SFX 141 N 1
SFX 141 0 دىراق .

SFX 142 N 1
SFX 142 0 ۈمچە .

SFX 143 N 1
SFX 143 0 ۋەتكەنلىك .

SFX 144 N 1
SFX 144 0 ىشقا .

SFX 145 N 1
SFX 145 0 لەيمىزكى .

SFX 146 N 1
SFX 146 0 تىكىدىن .

SFX 147 N 1
SFX 147 0 اندۇرۇلۇش .

SFX 148 N 1
SFX 148 0 خەيرى .

SFX 149 N 1
SFX 149 0 رقىراپ .

SFX 150 N 1
SFX 150 0 ىتىڭلارنى .

SFX 151 N 1
SFX 151 0 ىغانلىرىنى .

SFX 152 N 1
SFX 152 0 ىرىيە .

SFX 153 N 1
SFX 153 0 يەلمەيمەن .

SFX 154 N 1
SFX 154 0 شىڭىزنىڭ .

SFX 155 N 1
SFX 155 0 ملۈك .

SFX 156 N 1
SFX 156 0 اتلاردىكى .

SFX 157 N 1
SFX 157 0 تورقا .

SFX 158 N 1
SFX 158 0 تۈرۈلۈشى .

SFX 159 N 1
SFX 159 0 رىسا .

SFX 160 N 1
SFX 160 0 ۈكلەرمۇ .

SFX 161 N 1
SFX 161 0 الايدىغانلىقى .

SFX 162 N 1
SFX 162 0 ومېتىرى .

SFX 163 N 1
SFX 163 0 شىنىمۇ .

SFX 164 N 1
SFX 164 0 رتمەك .

SFX 165 N 1
SFX 165 0 ېڭلىق .

SFX 166 N 1
SFX 166 0 لىقىنىمۇ .

SFX 167 N 1
SFX 167 0 غۇدەكلا .

SFX 168 N 1
SFX 168 0 ۇڭما .

SFX 169 N 1
SFX 169 0 اسلىقتىن .

SFX 170 N 1
SFX 170 0 گەردىن .

SFX 171 N 1
SFX 171 0 اشتۇرسا .

SFX 172 N 1
SFX 172 0 ۇنلىشىش .

SFX 173 N 1
SFX 173 0 ۇليار .

SFX 174 N 1
SFX 174 0 بۇرجەك .

SFX 175 N 1
SFX 175 0 تىك .

SFX 176 N 1
SFX 176 0 لىقىدەك .

SFX 177 N 1
SFX 177 0 ەتخانا .

SFX 178 N 1
SFX 178 0 زلىكىدىن .

SFX 179 N 1
SFX 179 0 ەيكى .

SFX 180 N 1
SFX 180 0 گىنىڭىزنى .

SFX 181 N 1
SFX 181 0 لىشىشكە .

SFX 182 N 1
SFX 182 0 لاشتۇرماق .

SFX 183 N 1
SFX 183 0 قىمىزدا .

SFX 184 N 1
SFX 184 0 نىشىدا .

SFX 185 N 1
SFX 185 0 ئىمىش .

SFX 186 N 1
SFX 186 0 اڭگىر .

SFX 187 N 1
SFX 187 0 تىسىلەر .

SFX 188 N 1
SFX 188 0 لامۇ .

SFX 189 N 1
SFX 189 0 شكەنمىز .

SFX 190 N 1
SFX 190 0 ەدىكى .

SFX 191 N 1
SFX 191 0 ۇۋېتىدىكەن .

SFX 192 N 1
SFX 192 0 چانلىقىنى .

SFX 193 N 1
SFX 193 0 نۇن .

SFX 194 N 1
SFX 194 0 يەتلىرىگە .

SFX 195 N 1
SFX 195 0 راقلا .

SFX 196 N 1
SFX 196 0 تەمنى .

SFX 197 N 1
SFX 197 0 اڭ .

SFX 198 N 1
SFX 198 0 باردى .

SFX 199 N 1
SFX 199 0 ۋاتسام .

SFX 200 N 1
SFX 200 0 تلىكنىڭ .

SFX 201 N 1
SFX 201 0 نغىنى .

SFX 202 N 1
SFX 202 0 سۇدىكى .

SFX 203 N 1
SFX 203 0 انىم .

SFX 204 N 1
SFX 204 0 ازان .

SFX 205 N 1
SFX 205 0 مەنكەن .

SFX 206 N 1
SFX 206 0 ەكتىكى .

SFX 207 N 1
SFX 207 0 ۇرمۇ .

SFX 208 N 1
SFX 208 0 ئام .

SFX 209 N 1
SFX 209 0 لىڭلارنى .

SFX 210 N 1
SFX 210 0 ولنى .

SFX 211 N 1
SFX 211 0 ۇتىدىن .

SFX 212 N 1
SFX 212 0 لەرچە .

SFX 213 N 1
SFX 213 0 امغا .

SFX 214 N 1
SFX 214 0 قىلداشماق .

SFX 215 N 1
SFX 215 0 تمىسىمۇ .

SFX 216 N 1
SFX 216 0 لىقىڭ .

SFX 217 N 1
SFX 217 0 شكەنلىكىنى .

SFX 218 N 1
SFX 218 0 انلاشتۇرۇش .

SFX 219 N 1
SFX 219 0 فنىڭ .

SFX 220 N 1
SFX 220 0 وبىل .

SFX 221 N 1
SFX 221 0 ىلىرىم .

SFX 222 N 1
SFX 222 0 ېزىيە .

SFX 223 N 1
SFX 223 0 اساق .

SFX 224 N 1
SFX 224 0 ىقلىرىدا .

SFX 225 N 1
SFX 225 0 گىز .

SFX 226 N 1
SFX 226 0 زۈشنى .

SFX 227 N 1
SFX 227 0 ىشىمگە .

SFX 228 N 1
SFX 228 0 ئەتتە .

SFX 229 N 1
SFX 229 0 اقلىرىڭىز .

SFX 230 N 1
SFX 230 0 دارلىرىغا .

SFX 231 N 1
SFX 231 0 ىمەستىن .

SFX 232 N 1
SFX 232 0 انلىرىڭىز .

SFX 233 N 1
SFX 233 0 رلەشمەك .

SFX 234 N 1
SFX 234 0 چوتى .

SFX 235 N 1
SFX 235 0 ۋەتتى .

SFX 236 N 1
SFX 236 0 ېتىدىغانلىقىنى .

SFX 237 N 1
SFX 237 0 زامان .

SFX 238 N 1
SFX 238 0 الغانلارنىڭ .

SFX 239 N 1
SFX 239 0 چانلىقىدىن .

SFX 240 N 1
SFX 240 0 ىچان .

SFX 241 N 1
SFX 241 0 اپتۇق .

SFX 242 N 1
SFX 242 0 رلۇقلارغا .

SFX 243 N 1
SFX 243 0 للاردۇر .

SFX 244 N 1
SFX 244 0 گۈلى .

SFX 245 N 1
SFX 245 0 تماسلىقى .

SFX 246 N 1
SFX 246 0 ورود .

SFX 247 N 1
SFX 247 0 پۇك .

SFX 248 N 1
SFX 248 0 ۇرۇۋەتتى .

SFX 249 N 1
SFX 249 0 لىرىڭ .

SFX 250 N 1
SFX 250 0 دىلار .

SFX 251 N 1
SFX 251 0 انمىش .

SFX 252 N 1
SFX 252 0 ېرىدىغان .

SFX 253 N 1
SFX 253 0 ۇقلۇق .

SFX 254 N 1
SFX 254 0 اللىرى .

SFX 255 N 1
SFX 255 0 چىگىچە .

SFX 256 N 1
SFX 256 0 ىيەلەر .

SFX 257 N 1
SFX 257 0 شىمىزنىڭ .

SFX 258 N 1
SFX 258 0 لۈكنىڭ .

SFX 259 N 1
SFX 259 0 ىقلاپ .

SFX 260 N 1
SFX 260 0 ىزنىڭمۇ .

SFX 261 N 1
SFX 261 0 ىنىڭگە .

SFX 262 N 1
SFX 262 0 ىزغىلا .

SFX 263 N 1
SFX 263 0 ۈكىنى .

SFX 264 N 1
SFX 264 0 ۇللارنى .

SFX 265 N 1
SFX 265 0 سلىماق .

SFX 266 N 1
SFX 266 0 مەت .

SFX 267 N 1
SFX 267 0 رساڭ .

SFX 268 N 1
SFX 268 0 الدى .

SFX 269 N 1
SFX 269 0 ۋۇلنىڭ .

SFX 270 N 1
SFX 270 0 چاڭ .

SFX 271 N 1
SFX 271 0 ۈلدۈر .

SFX 272 N 1
SFX 272 0 رىيەنى .

SFX 273 N 1
SFX 273 0 جاڭنىڭ .

SFX 274 N 1
SFX 274 0 اتتىق .

SFX 275 N 1
SFX 275 0 كاتلار .

SFX 276 N 1
SFX 276 0 تكۈچىلەر .

SFX 277 N 1
SFX 277 0 دەڭ .

SFX 278 N 1
SFX 278 0 جاڭلىق .

SFX 279 N 1
SFX 279 0 نغۇچ .

SFX 280 N 1
SFX 280 0 ۇچىلاردۇر .

SFX 281 N 1
SFX 281 0 سىزلىكىگە .

SFX 282 N 1
SFX 282 0 شەددە .

SFX 283 N 1
SFX 283 0 دارچىلىق .

SFX 284 N 1
SFX 284 0 ببا .

SFX 285 N 1
SFX 285 0 ۇشىڭىز .

SFX 286 N 1
SFX 286 0 ۇچىلىرىغا .

SFX 287 N 1
SFX 287 0 ازىغا .

SFX 288 N 1
SFX 288 0 انمىسۇن .

SFX 289 N 1
SFX 289 0 سىزكەن .

SFX 290 N 1
SFX 290 0 لىشىۋالغان .

SFX 291 N 1
SFX 291 0 سمۇ .

SFX 292 N 1
SFX 292 0 قلىشىدۇ .

SFX 293 N 1
SFX 293 0 ئۇلى .

SFX 294 N 1
SFX 294 0 لىكىمنى .

SFX 295 N 1
SFX 295 0 غاندىكىن .

SFX 296 N 1
SFX 296 0 غىدىن .

SFX 297 N 1
SFX 297 0 قىمىكىن .

SFX 298 N 1
SFX 298 0 ۇردۇر .

SFX 299 N 1
SFX 299 0 يەلمىدى .

SFX 300 N 1
SFX 300 0 ۇنلىرى .

SFX 301 N 1
SFX 301 0 ۇرت .

SFX 302 N 1
SFX 302 0 وندىن .

SFX 303 N 1
SFX 303 0 مۇچ .

SFX 304 N 1
SFX 304 0 ىرىڭلار .

SFX 305 N 1
SFX 305 0 ەرگەن .

SFX 306 N 1
SFX 306 0 ېگەن .

SFX 307 N 1
SFX 307 0 ناسلارنىڭ .

SFX 308 N 1
SFX 308 0 ىمىغا .

SFX 309 N 1
SFX 309 0 رىخى .

SFX 310 N 1
SFX 310 0 شكە .

SFX 311 N 1
SFX 311 0 ېنىمىزغا .

SFX 312 N 1
SFX 312 0 كېپىنىكى .

SFX 313 N 1
SFX 313 0 تامسىلەر .

SFX 314 N 1
SFX 314 0 شسەن .

SFX 315 N 1
SFX 315 0 شلىغان .

SFX 316 N 1
SFX 316 0 للىقىغا .

SFX 317 N 1
SFX 317 0 سىڭىر .

SFX 318 N 1
SFX 318 0 ىشىشتا .

SFX 319 N 1
SFX 319 0 جاننى .

SFX 320 N 1
SFX 320 0 نچىلىقى .

SFX 321 N 1
SFX 321 0 سىزلارچە .

SFX 322 N 1
SFX 322 0 كتۇ .

SFX 323 N 1
SFX 323 0 مىگىنە .

SFX 324 N 1
SFX 324 0 ەتلا .

SFX 325 N 1
SFX 325 0 ەتمەيمىز .

SFX 326 N 1
SFX 326 0 رچە .

SFX 327 N 1
SFX 327 0 ورمۇ .

SFX 328 N 1
SFX 328 0 الپۇك .

SFX 329 N 1
SFX 329 0 اللار .

SFX 330 N 1
SFX 330 0 شلىتىش .

SFX 331 N 1
SFX 331 0 زېھىن .

SFX 332 N 1
SFX 332 0 تسىز .

SFX 333 N 1
SFX 333 0 يەتتۇر .

SFX 334 N 1
SFX 334 0 ىسەڭ .

SFX 335 N 1
SFX 335 0 ۇۋالغاندىن .

SFX 336 N 1
SFX 336 0 ملۇققا .

SFX 337 N 1
SFX 337 0 سىدىن .

SFX 338 N 1
SFX 338 0 مىزغىمۇ .

SFX 339 N 1
SFX 339 0 ەردەكلا .

SFX 340 N 1
SFX 340 0 قانلىقتىن .

SFX 341 N 1
SFX 341 0 رغىن .

SFX 342 N 1
SFX 342 0 رمەن .

SFX 343 N 1
SFX 343 0 پلىقتىن .

SFX 344 N 1
SFX 344 0 خاس .

SFX 345 N 1
SFX 345 0 چىسىدۇر .

SFX 346 N 1
SFX 346 0 سىلىق .

SFX 347 N 1
SFX 347 0 دۇقمۇ .

SFX 348 N 1
SFX 348 0 سلىرىنىڭ .

SFX 349 N 1
SFX 349 0 ىيەسىدە .

SFX 350 N 1
SFX 350 0 شتىن .

SFX 351 N 1
SFX 351 0 تىدىغانلىقىنى .

SFX 352 N 1
SFX 352 0 ەردى .

SFX 353 N 1
SFX 353 0 چسىز .

SFX 354 N 1
SFX 354 0 ىلغاچقا .

SFX 355 N 1
SFX 355 0 تىلىشىش .

SFX 356 N 1
SFX 356 0 شىنىڭ .

SFX 357 N 1
SFX 357 0 الايسىلەر .

SFX 358 N 1
SFX 358 0 ناننى .

SFX 359 N 1
SFX 359 0 رلىقلار .

SFX 360 N 1
SFX 360 0 چىمەنكى .

SFX 361 N 1
SFX 361 0 رەككەن .

SFX 362 N 1
SFX 362 0 نىمنى .

SFX 363 N 1
SFX 363 0 ەتلىرىدىن .

SFX 364 N 1
SFX 364 0 گۆش .

SFX 365 N 1
SFX 365 0 ژنا .

SFX 366 N 1
SFX 366 0 ېيىم .

SFX 367 N 1
SFX 367 0 اقلارنى .

SFX 368 N 1
SFX 368 0 تۇرۇلماق .

SFX 369 N 1
SFX 369 0 راشتىن .

SFX 370 N 1
SFX 370 0 كەنىدى .

SFX 371 N 1
SFX 371 0 ىكسەن .

SFX 372 N 1
SFX 372 0 تاتنى .

SFX 373 N 1
SFX 373 0 شىڭنى .

SFX 374 N 1
SFX 374 0 اھلىرىغا .

SFX 375 N 1
SFX 375 0 لىمىنى .

SFX 376 N 1
SFX 376 0 الىز .

SFX 377 N 1
SFX 377 0 الىسىڭىز .
